Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2508
Joint public agencies; creation authorized.

Any combination of two or more public agencies may create one or more joint public agencies to exercise the powers and authority prescribed by the Joint Public Agency Act.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 8.